Vermont, session 2025-2026, H875.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 2821 is amended to read:
§ 2821. DEFINITIONS
VT LEG #386253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.875
2026 Page 2 of 8
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Child” means any person under 16 years of age.
(2) “Sexual conduct” means any of the following:
(A) any conduct involving contact between the penis and the vulva,
the penis and the penis, the penis and the anus, the mouth and the penis, the
mouth and the anus, the vulva and the vulva, or the mouth and the vulva;
(B) any intrusion, however slight, by any part of a person’s body or
any object into the genital or anal opening of another with the intent of
arousing, appealing to, or gratifying the lust, passions, or sexual desire of any
person;
(C) any intentional touching, not through the clothing, of the genitals,
anus, or breasts of another with the intent of arousing, appealing to, or
gratifying the lust, passions, or sexual desire of any person;
(D) masturbation;
(E) bestiality;
(F) sadomasochistic abuse for sexual purposes; or
(G) any simulation of the conduct described in subdivisions (2)(A)–
(F) of this section subdivision (2).
VT LEG #386253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.875
2026 Page 3 of 8
(3) “Performance” means:
(A) an event that is photographed, filmed, or visually recorded; or
(B) a play, dance, or other visual presentation or exhibition before an
audience.
(4) “Sexual performance” means any performance or any part of a
performance that includes sexual conduct by, with, or on a child.
(5) “Promote” means to procure, issue, manufacture, publish, sell, give,
provide, lend, mail, deliver, distribute, disseminate, circulate, present, exhibit,
advertise, make available, or offer to do the same, by any means, including
electronic transmission, file sharing, or peer-to-peer networks.
(6) “Peer-to-peer network” means a network in which two or more
computers or devices share files without requiring a separate server computer
or server software.
(7)(A) “Simulation” means the explicit depiction of any conduct
described in subdivisions (2)(A)–(F) of this section that:
(i) involves a child as defined in subdivision (1) of this section;
(ii) creates the appearance of such conduct; and
(iii) exhibits naked genitals, buttocks, or breasts below the top of
the areola.
(B) “Simulation” does not include paintings, drawings, or nonvisual
or written descriptions of sexual conduct.
VT LEG #386253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.875
2026 Page 4 of 8
(C) “Simulation” applies only to conduct.
(8) “Adversarial testing” means red teaming or another activity
or exercise conducted in a controlled environment and in collaboration with
an artificial intelligence developer to identify a potential adverse behavior
or outcome of a model or system, to determine how the potential adverse
behavior or outcome of a model or system could occur to stress test
safeguards, and to conduct other structured evaluation methods as set forth
by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.
(9) “Computer generated” means produced, adapted, or modified, in
whole or in part, through the use of artificial intelligence.
(10)(A) “Indistinguishable” means a visual or print medium that
is such that an ordinary person viewing the visual or print medium would
conclude that the visual or print medium depicts an actual child engaged in
the conduct depicted.
(B) “Indistinguishable” does not include a visual or print
medium that depicts a child that is a painting, drawing, or sculpture.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 2824 is amended to read:
§ 2824. PROMOTING A RECORDING OF SEXUAL CONDUCT
(a)(1) No person may, with knowledge of the character and content,
promote any photograph, film, or visual recording of sexual conduct:
VT LEG #386253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.875
2026 Page 5 of 8
(A) by, with, or on a child, or of a lewd exhibition of a child’s
genitals or anus; or
(B) that is indistinguishable from the image of a child engaging in
sexual conduct, including a visual or print medium that is computer generated.
(2) This subsection does not apply to:
(A) paintings, drawings, or to nonvisual or written descriptions of
sexual conduct;
(B) a visual or print medium possessed, controlled, or intentionally
viewed as part of a law enforcement investigation; or
(C) an interactive computer service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230 for:
(i) content provided by another party; and
(ii) a computer-generated visual or print medium depicting
sexually explicit conduct involving a child when the visual or print medium is
generated as part of adversarial testing conducted in good faith to prevent,
detect, or mitigate the risk of artificial intelligence systems generating a visual
or print medium depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child.
(b) In any prosecution arising under this section, the defendant may raise
any of the following affirmative defenses:
(1) that the recording was promoted for a bona fide medical,
psychological, social work, legislative, judicial, or law enforcement purpose,
by or to a physician, psychologist, social worker, legislator, judge, prosecutor,
VT LEG #386253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.875
2026 Page 6 of 8
law enforcement officer, or other person having such a bona fide interest in the
subject matter;
(2) that the defendant was a bona fide school, museum, or public library,
or was a person acting in the course of employment as an employee or official
of such an organization or of a retail outlet affiliated with and serving the
educational or intended purpose of that school, museum, or library; or
(3) that the defendant in good faith had a reasonable basis to conclude
that the child in fact had attained 16 years of age when the recording was
made.
(c) The exemption in subdivision (a)(2)(C) of this section does not include
a person who engages in adversarial testing for personal or exploitative
purposes or for purposes unrelated to legitimate artificial intelligence safety
testing.
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 2827 is amended to read:
§ 2827. POSSESSION OF CHILD SEXUAL ABUSE MATERIAL
(a) No person shall, with knowledge of the character and content, possess
or knowingly access with intent to view any photograph, film, or visual
depiction, including any depiction that is stored electronically, of sexual
conduct:
(1) by, with, or on a child or of a clearly lewd exhibition of a child’s
genitals or anus; or
VT LEG #386253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.875
2026 Page 7 of 8
(2) that is indistinguishable from the image of a child engaging in sexual
conduct, including a visual or print medium that is computer generated.
(b) This section shall not apply:
(1) if the depiction was possessed for a bona fide medical,
psychological, social work, legislative, judicial, or law enforcement purpose,
by a physician, psychologist, social worker, legislator, judge, prosecutor, law
enforcement officer, or other person having such a bona fide interest in the
subject matter;
(2) if the person was a bona fide school, museum, or public library, or
was a person acting in the course of employment as an employee or official of
such an organization or of a retail outlet affiliated with and serving the
educational or intended purpose of that school, museum, or library; or
(3) to paintings, drawings, or nonvisual or written descriptions of sexual
conduct; or
(4) an interactive computer service as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230 for:
(A) content provided by another party; and
(B) a computer-generated visual or print medium depicting sexually
explicit conduct involving a child when the visual or print medium is generated
as part of adversarial testing conducted in good faith to prevent, detect, or
mitigate the risk of artificial intelligence systems generating a visual or print
medium depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child.
VT LEG #386253 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.875
2026 Page 8 of 8
(c) In any prosecution arising under this section, the defendant may raise
any of the following affirmative defenses, which shall be proven by a
preponderance of the evidence:
(1) that the defendant in good faith had a reasonable basis to conclude
that the child in fact had attained 16 years of age when the depiction was made;
or
(2) that the defendant in good faith took reasonable steps, whether
successful or not, to destroy or eliminate the depiction.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386253 v.1